Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202186-1305
Grants; priority for distribution.

The commission shall distribute grants based on priority as follows:

(1) The first priority is a project in a project area that is an unserved area which the commission has determined pursuant to section 75-160 or 86-166 needs further support but has not received public assistance for development of a broadband network;

(2) The second priority is a project that is in an unserved area, that has received federal support for development of a broadband network, and that will not be completed within twenty-four months after the grant application deadline if the commission determines that a grant under the program will accelerate the deployment of the broadband network; and

(3) The third priority is a project in a project area that is an underserved area and that the commission determines has a digital inclusion plan.

Laws 2021, LB388, § 5.
May 27, 2021